Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-307
Sections; applicability; how construed.

Sections 73-301 to 73-306 shall not apply to the Nebraska Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act, the State Building Construction Alternatives Act, the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, sections 39-2808 to 39-2823, or section 57-1503.

Sections 73-301 to 73-306 shall not be construed to apply to renewals of contracts already approved pursuant to or not subject to such sections, to amendments to such contracts, or to renewals of such amendments unless the amendments would directly cause or result in the replacement by the private entity of additional permanent state employees or positions greater than the replacement caused by the original contract.

Laws 1995, LB 519, § 11;

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB4, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB960, § 29;

Laws 2018, LB775, § 35;

Laws 2025, LB660, § 28.

Nebraska Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act, see section 81-1702.
>
State Building Construction Alternatives Act, see section 73-1101.

State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, see section 37-1701.